Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 11 Voting Districts and Officials

17-11-1.
Division of towns and representative district into voting districts.

The local board of any city or town may, on or before the sixtieth (60th) day preceding any election, divide or redivide the city or town, or any representative district in the city or town, into voting districts. The local board of each city or town shall determine voting districts by geographical boundaries and by no other means. No voting district shall at any time comprise parts of two (2) or more wards. It shall be the duty of the board to divide the city or town, representative district, or ward, so that substantially not more than three thousand (3000) total eligible registered voters shall be served by the same polling place; provided, however, that any divisions conducted by the local board pursuant to this section shall not result in creating a polling place serving less than five hundred (500) total eligible registered voters, except when a polling place is located in a low-income or elderly residential development, or when it is caused by legislative district boundaries; and provided, further, that no existing polling place which is presently located in a low-income or elderly residential development shall be eliminated. Upon the establishment and approval of any polling place by the state board, changes to the polling place shall not be allowed until the next redistricting by the general assembly, unless the polling place becomes unavailable to the city or town, or no longer meets polling place minimum requirements as established by the state board, then the city or town may take the appropriate action to replace the polling place. A polling place may be located either within or without the voting district for which it is established; provided, that a polling place may be located outside the district only upon unanimous determination of the local board and subject to the approval of the state board that a suitable place is not available within the voting district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 1966, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 6; P.L. 2002, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 476, § 1.

17-11-1.1.
Combination of voting districts for special election.

The board of canvassers of any city or town at which there shall be submitted to the voters a question or questions for their approval or rejection or at which officials will be elected, shall have the authority to combine two (2) or more voting districts, when in its judgment the combination is advisable, and when combined shall be treated as a voting district, but only upon the approval of the board of elections.

If voting districts are combined as provided in subsection (a), the local board must advertise the combination of districts in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town no less than seven (7) days and no more than twenty-one (21) days before the special election.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 69, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 79, § 1.]

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b), the board of canvassers of the town of Bristol may combine two (2) or more voting districts for the representative district 68 special election in March, 2019, and when combined shall be treated as a voting district, but only upon the approval of the board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 1986, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 74; P.L. 2003, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 79, § 1.

17-11-2.
Notice of division or redivision of districts.

The local boards, upon the dividing or redividing of a senatorial or representative district, shall give public notice of what senatorial or representative districts have been divided or redivided into voting districts by publication in some newspaper having a general circulation in the city or town, and shall post, for a period of forty (40) days, a map in the office of the board or in the town clerk’s office showing the lines of the voting districts, and shall at all times keep the map on file in their respective offices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7.

17-11-3 — 17-11-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 38, §§ 3, 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 48, §§ 3, 5; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, §§ 35, 36; P.L. 1911, ch. 677, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1038, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 49, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 331, §§ 3, 4; P.L. 1941, ch. 1041, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3577, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§ 17-11-4, 17-11-5; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 1988, ch. 630, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1, effective November 9, 2009.

17-11-6.
Appointment of district moderators and clerks in cities or towns.

All district clerks and district moderators in each of Rhode Island’s towns shall be appointed by the local canvassing authority of each municipality at least thirty-five (35) days before any election or district or town meeting.

The appointment of the district clerks and moderators shall be from a list of not less than ten (10) registered voters submitted by the chairpersons of the local political town committees. Each town committee chairperson shall submit said names at least fifteen (15) days prior to the appointment date as set by the local canvassing board.

If the local chairpersons fail to submit a list of names as provided herein, the appointments shall be made by the local board of canvassers from the voting list of the town.

The appointed district clerk and district moderator of a polling place shall not be of the same political party.

Any district moderator or district clerk elected to office in the 2008 general election shall continue to serve in his/her position through the conclusion of his/her term, but in no event later than December 31, 2010.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 48, § 3; P.L. 1911, ch. 677, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1038, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 49, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 331, § 3; P.L. 1941, ch. 1041, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3577, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 2.

17-11-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 798, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 48, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 48, § 3; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 35; P.L. 1911, ch. 677, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1038, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 49, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 331, § 3; P.L. 1941, ch. 1041, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3577, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1, effective November 9, 2009.

17-11-7.1.
Pool of election officials.

Notwithstanding any other general law to the contrary, local boards are authorized to create a pool of election officials who shall be available to fill vacancies wherever needed. These election officials shall have the same training and duties as regular election officials, but shall not be restricted to being electors of the voting district to which they may be assigned, but must be electors of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 352, § 1.

17-11-7.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 451, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1, effective November 9, 2009.

17-11-8.
Qualifications of moderators and clerks — Vacancies.

The moderators and clerks shall each be able to read the Constitution of the state in the English language, and to write their names. Every person appointed as a moderator or clerk shall immediately be notified of his or her appointment and shall, within five (5) days of his or her appointment, accept or decline the appointment, and shall be, at least three (3) days prior to the election, sworn to the faithful discharge of his or her duties by some member of the board making the appointment. In case any appointed person neglects to qualify or is unable or fails to serve, the vacancy shall be filled by the board making the appointment, and the appointee shall be, whenever possible, of the same political affiliation as the person failing to qualify, and shall, before serving, qualify before some member of the board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 48, § 3; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 35; P.L. 1911, ch. 677, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1038, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 49, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 331, § 3; P.L. 1941, ch. 1041, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3577, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1.

17-11-9.
Election of moderator or clerk pro tempore.

In case of the absence of the moderator or of the clerk of any town meeting, of a town not divided into voting districts, the town meeting may elect a moderator or clerk pro tempore, and the town clerk shall preside at the election of the moderator.

In case of the absence of the moderator or of the clerk of a voting district in a town not divided into senatorial or representative districts, the voting district meeting may elect a moderator or clerk pro tempore, and the clerk shall preside in the election of a moderator. At least five (5) electors shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the purpose of electing the moderator or clerk pro tempore.

In case of the absence of the moderator or of the clerk of a senatorial or representative district or of a voting district in a senatorial or representative district divided into voting districts, the district meeting may elect a moderator or clerk pro tempore, and the clerk shall preside in the election of a moderator. At least five (5) electors shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the purpose of electing the moderator or clerk pro tempore.

The elected officer shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of his or her duties by any person authorized to administer oaths, and shall hold office in the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Warwick, Cranston, Woonsocket, and Newport, and in the towns of Barrington, Middletown, and Warren, until a moderator or clerk is appointed by the local board respectively and in all other cities and towns until the election and qualification of the officer’s successor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 38, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 48, § 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 38; P.L. 1912, ch. 850, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 49, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 331, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1041, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3577, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7.

17-11-10.
Filling of vacancies by town council.

In case of the death, resignation, or permanent disability of the moderator of any town, or of the moderator or clerk of any senatorial or representative district, except in the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Warwick, Cranston, Woonsocket, and Newport, or of any voting district in any town, except the towns of Barrington, Middletown, and Warren, not divided into senatorial or representative districts, the town council may fill the vacancy from the list of registered voters submitted by the party chairperson under whose party designation the moderator or clerk had been elected. In the absence of a submitted list, or, if the person, when elected, was not affiliated with any party, the town council may make its choice from the list of registered voters.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 38, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 48, § 11; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 49, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 331, § 8; P.L. 1941, ch. 1041, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2391, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3577, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1.

17-11-11.
Selection of wardens and clerks in cities.

At least thirty-five (35) days before any election, the local board in each city shall appoint for each polling place within the city where an election is to be held a warden and clerk, not from the same political party. The appointments shall be made from a list of not less than ten (10) registered voters presented to the board by the city or town committees of the political parties at least forty-five (45) days before any election.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 32; P.L. 1940, ch. 819, § 3; P.L. 1944, ch. 1474, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1.

17-11-12.
Qualifications of election officials — Vacancies.

Election officials shall, whenever possible, be qualified electors in the city, town, senatorial or representative district, or voting district in which they are appointed to serve, and shall severally be able to read the Constitution of the state in the English language and to write their names. Every person appointed as a warden, clerk, moderator, or supervisor shall, within forty-eight (48) hours thereafter, be notified in writing by the clerk of the local board of the appointment; and the person appointed shall, within five (5) days of his or her appointment, notify the clerk in writing of that person’s acceptance or declination of the appointment, and any vacancy occurring among these election officials, whether by declination or refusal to serve or by failure to notify the clerk, or by failure from any cause to appear at or remain during the time when they are required to perform their duties, shall be immediately filled by the local board, or by its presiding officer if the board is not in session, from the lists provided for in §

17-11-10

. Each of these election officials shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of his or her duties before entering upon the performance of his duties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, § 35; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 32; P.L. 1940, ch. 819, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1.

17-11-12.1.
High school election officials.

Notwithstanding any other general law to the contrary, and in order to provide for a greater awareness of the elections process, the rights and responsibilities of voters and the importance of participating in the electoral process, as well as to provide additional workers, an elections official may appoint not more than five (5) students per ward, and/or precinct to serve under the direct supervision of ward, and/or precinct board members designated by the elections official. A student may be appointed, notwithstanding lack of eligibility to vote, subject to the approval of the educational institution in which the student is enrolled, if the student possesses the following qualifications:

Is at least sixteen (16) years of age at the time of the election to which he or she is serving as a member of a ward, and/or precinct board.

Is a United States citizen or will be a citizen at the time of the election to which he or she is serving as a member of a ward, and/or precinct board.

Is a student in good standing attending a public or private secondary educational institution.

Is a junior or senior and has a grade point average of at least 2.5 on a 4.0 scale.

A student appointed pursuant to this section may not be used to tally votes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 481, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 95.

17-11-13.
Appointment and compensation of supervisors.

The local board of each city and town, at least thirty-five (35) days before each election, shall appoint two (2) pairs of supervisors for each polling place, each pair of which shall not be comprised of two (2) persons from the same political party. Supervisors shall, if possible, be appointed from a list of eligible voters presented and employed in the same manner as provided by this chapter for the appointment of wardens and clerks.

The local board may, in its discretion, or upon the direction of the state board appoint one or more additional supervisors for any polling place whenever and so long as the appointment is, in the judgment of either board, necessary to facilitate the conduct of an election.

The supervisors of elections in all cities and towns shall severally receive compensation for their services at the minimum rate of sixty dollars ($60) per day.

The local board may adopt a plan for some or all supervisors to work a half-day at half-pay if the plan is consistent with the provisions of this section and is approved by the state board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) above, the local board of a city or town may, upon written approval of the board of elections, reduce the number of supervisors at polling places within their jurisdiction.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 32; P.L. 1900, ch. 798, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, §§ 35, 37; G.L., ch. 11, §§ 35, 38; P.L. 1901, ch. 640, §§ 18, 21; P.L. 1919, ch. 1734, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, §§ 34, 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, §§ 32, 33; P.L. 1940, ch. 819, §§ 3, 6; P.L. 1944, ch. 1474, § 1; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 18; G.L. 1956, §§

17-11-11

,

17-11-13

; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 523, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 1.

17-11-14.
Supervision of all elections on same day.

Whenever any city or town elections occur on the same day as an election for national or state officers in any city or town, the supervisors appointed pursuant to §

17-11-13

shall be the supervisors for all of the elections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-11-15.
Persons ineligible to serve as election officials.

No person shall be appointed or serve as an election official who has been convicted, found guilty, pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, or placed on a deferred or suspended sentence, or on probation, for any crime which involves moral turpitude or which constitutes a violation of any of the election or caucus laws of this or any other state. No person shall be disqualified simply because he or she is a notary public. No candidate for any office to be filled at any election shall be appointed at the election as an election official. Every election official shall make an affidavit before some member of the proper board of canvassers, to the effect that he or she is not disqualified by reason of the provisions of this section; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to moderators and town clerks.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, § 40; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 35; P.L. 1940, ch. 819, §§ 3, 6; P.L. 1944, ch. 1474, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-15

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 99, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 264, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 203, § 1.

17-11-16.
Supervision of adjourned elections.

In the event that a second, adjourned, or subsequent election is held in accordance with the provisions of this title, the same supervisors of election who acted at the first election shall act at the second or adjourned or other subsequent election, and shall have and exercise the same powers and duties at the second or adjourned or other subsequent election as are prescribed by this title for them to have and exercise at the first election; and the supervisors shall perform the same duties as in the first election.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, § 55; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

17-11-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-11-17.
Telephone — Polling place.

If there is a telephone within a polling place, then the owner of the building in which the polling place is located shall allow use of the telephone for official business by the warden, clerk, and state inspector during the period beginning one hour before the opening of the polling place and ending one hour after the closing of the polling place. The local board of canvassers shall be required to reimburse the owner of the building for that portion of any telephone bill resulting from the use of the telephone by any of the election officials mentioned in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 283, § 1.